dictionaries/tr_TR/tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 24015 N 1
SFX 24015 0 dirmesine .

SFX 24016 N 1
SFX 24016 0 lendirelim .

SFX 24017 N 1
SFX 24017 0 yazı .

SFX 24018 N 1
SFX 24018 0 ntüleri .

SFX 24019 N 1
SFX 24019 0 ırlaşmak .

SFX 24020 N 1
SFX 24020 0 ndırmalarla .

SFX 24021 N 1
SFX 24021 0 mayadır .

SFX 24022 N 1
SFX 24022 0 izleştirilip .

SFX 24023 N 1
SFX 24023 0 poz .

SFX 24024 N 1
SFX 24024 0 itidir .

SFX 24025 N 1
SFX 24025 0 tmaya .

SFX 24026 N 1
SFX 24026 0 kenar .

SFX 24027 N 1
SFX 24027 0 şış .

SFX 24028 N 1
SFX 24028 0 irilmelerinde .

SFX 24029 N 1
SFX 24029 0 lendirilmiş .

SFX 24030 N 1
SFX 24030 0 ayacakmışız .

SFX 24031 N 1
SFX 24031 0 tirdiklerine .

SFX 24032 N 1
SFX 24032 0 urduğunu .

SFX 24033 N 1
SFX 24033 0 ttirmeniz .

SFX 24034 N 1
SFX 24034 0 ebilmişim .

SFX 24035 N 1
SFX 24035 0 üklüğün .

SFX 24036 N 1
SFX 24036 0 msinde .

SFX 24037 N 1
SFX 24037 0 süleri .

SFX 24038 N 1
SFX 24038 0 rüyse .

SFX 24039 N 1
SFX 24039 0 ttırılıp .

SFX 24040 N 1
SFX 24040 0 şçılar .

SFX 24041 N 1
SFX 24041 0 durmaları .

SFX 24042 N 1
SFX 24042 0 ninkiyse .

SFX 24043 N 1
SFX 24043 0 ıranına .

SFX 24044 N 1
SFX 24044 0 rmeyeceğim .

SFX 24045 N 1
SFX 24045 0 inidir .

SFX 24046 N 1
SFX 24046 0 başıyı .

SFX 24047 N 1
SFX 24047 0 irlerden .

SFX 24048 N 1
SFX 24048 0 ndekini .

SFX 24049 N 1
SFX 24049 0 rursam .

SFX 24050 N 1
SFX 24050 0 casıdır .

SFX 24051 N 1
SFX 24051 0 elek .

SFX 24052 N 1
SFX 24052 0 nabildiğinden .

SFX 24053 N 1
SFX 24053 0 unuzca .

SFX 24054 N 1
SFX 24054 0 alada .

SFX 24055 N 1
SFX 24055 0 layamayacağını .

SFX 24056 N 1
SFX 24056 0 ustu .

SFX 24057 N 1
SFX 24057 0 leştirilecektir .

SFX 24058 N 1
SFX 24058 0 uğumdan .

SFX 24059 N 1
SFX 24059 0 pleriniz .

SFX 24060 N 1
SFX 24060 0 tirtmek .

SFX 24061 N 1
SFX 24061 0 pteyim .

SFX 24062 N 1
SFX 24062 0 endendir .

SFX 24063 N 1
SFX 24063 0 tayız .

SFX 24064 N 1
SFX 24064 0 racaklarının .

SFX 24065 N 1
SFX 24065 0 sundaydım .

SFX 24066 N 1
SFX 24066 0 ayorum .

SFX 24067 N 1
SFX 24067 0 ağınızdır .

SFX 24068 N 1
SFX 24068 0 ritlerinde .

SFX 24069 N 1
SFX 24069 0 ılaşmasının .

SFX 24070 N 1
SFX 24070 0 dini .

SFX 24071 N 1
SFX 24071 0 ştireceğine .

SFX 24072 N 1
SFX 24072 0 işmek .

SFX 24073 N 1
SFX 24073 0 yişiniz .

SFX 24074 N 1
SFX 24074 0 çlerini .

SFX 24075 N 1
SFX 24075 0 kanı .

SFX 24076 N 1
SFX 24076 0 arıdır .

SFX 24077 N 1
SFX 24077 0 dırabileceği .

SFX 24078 N 1
SFX 24078 0 alsın .

SFX 24079 N 1
SFX 24079 0 lenmesine .

SFX 24080 N 1
SFX 24080 0 iyetti .

SFX 24081 N 1
SFX 24081 0 erlere .

SFX 24082 N 1
SFX 24082 0 atiğe .

SFX 24083 N 1
SFX 24083 0 veler .

SFX 24084 N 1
SFX 24084 0 hatten .

SFX 24085 N 1
SFX 24085 0 asım .

SFX 24086 N 1
SFX 24086 0 rlüğünden .

SFX 24087 N 1
SFX 24087 0 besiz .

SFX 24088 N 1
SFX 24088 0 usuydu .

SFX 24089 N 1
SFX 24089 0 ubun .

SFX 24090 N 1
SFX 24090 0 rmazsa .

SFX 24091 N 1
SFX 24091 0 lıklarımıza .

SFX 24092 N 1
SFX 24092 0 laştığından .

SFX 24093 N 1
SFX 24093 0 acağımızdan .

SFX 24094 N 1
SFX 24094 0 leyeceğimi .

SFX 24095 N 1
SFX 24095 0 laştırabileceğimizi .

SFX 24096 N 1
SFX 24096 0 rınızı .

SFX 24097 N 1
SFX 24097 0 nizdenim .

SFX 24098 N 1
SFX 24098 0 kur .

SFX 24099 N 1
SFX 24099 0 rliklerini .

SFX 24100 N 1
SFX 24100 0 naklılık .

SFX 24101 N 1
SFX 24101 0 kiz .

SFX 24102 N 1
SFX 24102 0 vah .

SFX 24103 N 1
SFX 24103 0 atına .

SFX 24104 N 1
SFX 24104 0 ştırmadığımız .

SFX 24105 N 1
SFX 24105 0 abilirsiniz .

SFX 24106 N 1
SFX 24106 0 riyetini .

SFX 24107 N 1
SFX 24107 0 dıklarınız .

SFX 24108 N 1
SFX 24108 0 çimizin .

SFX 24109 N 1
SFX 24109 0 ırmış .

SFX 24110 N 1
SFX 24110 0 ılmaları .

SFX 24111 N 1
SFX 24111 0 basından .

SFX 24112 N 1
SFX 24112 0 malarımızda .

SFX 24113 N 1
SFX 24113 0 ttiğimi .

SFX 24114 N 1
SFX 24114 0 ıldığımızda .

SFX 24115 N 1
SFX 24115 0 anmışa .

SFX 24116 N 1
SFX 24116 0 abamı .

SFX 24117 N 1
SFX 24117 0 nmayacağım .

SFX 24118 N 1
SFX 24118 0 iciliğiyle .

SFX 24119 N 1
SFX 24119 0 amayasınız .

SFX 24120 N 1
SFX 24120 0 lanabildiği .

SFX 24121 N 1
SFX 24121 0 sıcanın .

SFX 24122 N 1
SFX 24122 0 vşekliği .

SFX 24123 N 1
SFX 24123 0 şılarak .

SFX 24124 N 1
SFX 24124 0 müştüm .

SFX 24125 N 1
SFX 24125 0 kleştirilmesini .

SFX 24126 N 1
SFX 24126 0 ameden .

SFX 24127 N 1
SFX 24127 0 aştırmama .

SFX 24128 N 1
SFX 24128 0 ılaştılar .

SFX 24129 N 1
SFX 24129 0 zlardayım .

SFX 24130 N 1
SFX 24130 0 cıymışım .

SFX 24131 N 1
SFX 24131 0 ruldular .

SFX 24132 N 1
SFX 24132 0 elliğiniz .

SFX 24133 N 1
SFX 24133 0 lünebilinir .

SFX 24134 N 1
SFX 24134 0 amazsanız .

SFX 24135 N 1
SFX 24135 0 ansım .

SFX 24136 N 1
SFX 24136 0 tirebiliyorlar .

SFX 24137 N 1
SFX 24137 0 ciliğinden .

SFX 24138 N 1
SFX 24138 0 leriz .

SFX 24139 N 1
SFX 24139 0 lamalarıyla .

SFX 24140 N 1
SFX 24140 0 uyruğun .

SFX 24141 N 1
SFX 24141 0 ştırmamın .

SFX 24142 N 1
SFX 24142 0 kunda .

SFX 24143 N 1
SFX 24143 0 yumu .

SFX 24144 N 1
SFX 24144 0 iversinler .

SFX 24145 N 1
SFX 24145 0 ğımızda .

SFX 24146 N 1
SFX 24146 0 ılmamakta .

SFX 24147 N 1
SFX 24147 0 tılma .

SFX 24148 N 1
SFX 24148 0 namedeki .

SFX 24149 N 1
SFX 24149 0 tırmalıdır .

SFX 24150 N 1
SFX 24150 0 klarımdandı .

SFX 24151 N 1
SFX 24151 0 iklerdeki .

SFX 24152 N 1
SFX 24152 0 tirilmesin .

SFX 24153 N 1
SFX 24153 0 lerdesindir .

SFX 24154 N 1
SFX 24154 0 ebilecekti .

SFX 24155 N 1
SFX 24155 0 utsan .

SFX 24156 N 1
SFX 24156 0 yalarım .

SFX 24157 N 1
SFX 24157 0 yleymiş .

SFX 24158 N 1
SFX 24158 0 isiydi .

SFX 24159 N 1
SFX 24159 0 üllerle .

SFX 24160 N 1
SFX 24160 0 atmasıdır .

SFX 24161 N 1
SFX 24161 0 üştür .

SFX 24162 N 1
SFX 24162 0 kanları .

SFX 24163 N 1
SFX 24163 0 eştirdim .

SFX 24164 N 1
SFX 24164 0 rmışsanız .

SFX 24165 N 1
SFX 24165 0 nelik .

SFX 24166 N 1
SFX 24166 0 düğümüzün .

SFX 24167 N 1
SFX 24167 0 erse .

SFX 24168 N 1
SFX 24168 0 nanım .

SFX 24169 N 1
SFX 24169 0 amazmış .

SFX 24170 N 1
SFX 24170 0 mamalarıydı .

SFX 24171 N 1
SFX 24171 0 ettiriyor .

SFX 24172 N 1
SFX 24172 0 ıranını .

SFX 24173 N 1
SFX 24173 0 lemeleriyle .

SFX 24174 N 1
SFX 24174 0 ikim .

SFX 24175 N 1
SFX 24175 0 mayacağa .

SFX 24176 N 1
SFX 24176 0 eyler .

SFX 24177 N 1
SFX 24177 0 ılabilirdir .

SFX 24178 N 1
SFX 24178 0 rircesine .

SFX 24179 N 1
SFX 24179 0 ği .

SFX 24180 N 1
SFX 24180 0 memdeki .

SFX 24181 N 1
SFX 24181 0 eştirerek .

SFX 24182 N 1
SFX 24182 0 ilebildi .

SFX 24183 N 1
SFX 24183 0 iverdiniz .

SFX 24184 N 1
SFX 24184 0 dınızdan .

SFX 24185 N 1
SFX 24185 0 lanmayasın .

SFX 24186 N 1
SFX 24186 0 ayacaktık .

SFX 24187 N 1
SFX 24187 0 bil .

SFX 24188 N 1
SFX 24188 0 aştıracaksınız .

SFX 24189 N 1
SFX 24189 0 umum .

SFX 24190 N 1
SFX 24190 0 adandı .

SFX 24191 N 1
SFX 24191 0 verlere .

SFX 24192 N 1
SFX 24192 0 larınkine .

SFX 24193 N 1
SFX 24193 0 terini .

SFX 24194 N 1
SFX 24194 0 ağızım .

SFX 24195 N 1
SFX 24195 0 utsa .

SFX 24196 N 1
SFX 24196 0 kilermiş .

SFX 24197 N 1
SFX 24197 0 masındandır .

SFX 24198 N 1
SFX 24198 0 uluktu .

SFX 24199 N 1
SFX 24199 0 ücülük .

SFX 24200 N 1
SFX 24200 0 lılığınızı .

SFX 24201 N 1
SFX 24201 0 nlerdendiniz .

SFX 24202 N 1
SFX 24202 0 cikleriyle .

SFX 24203 N 1
SFX 24203 0 lilerini .

SFX 24204 N 1
SFX 24204 0 isiydik .

SFX 24205 N 1
SFX 24205 0 allaştırıldığını .

SFX 24206 N 1
SFX 24206 0 iverseydin .

SFX 24207 N 1
SFX 24207 0 ırmalarını .

SFX 24208 N 1
SFX 24208 0 ılabildikleri .

SFX 24209 N 1
SFX 24209 0 malarıydı .

SFX 24210 N 1
SFX 24210 0 rilmemesinin .

SFX 24211 N 1
SFX 24211 0 sçıları .

SFX 24212 N 1
SFX 24212 0 tliymiş .

SFX 24213 N 1
SFX 24213 0 müzdeydi .

SFX 24214 N 1
SFX 24214 0 ümleri .

SFX 24215 N 1
SFX 24215 0 anırsınız .

SFX 24216 N 1
SFX 24216 0 muzsun .

SFX 24217 N 1
SFX 24217 0 lanmaksızın .

SFX 24218 N 1
SFX 24218 0 lanmışlardı .

SFX 24219 N 1
SFX 24219 0 nmanızın .

SFX 24220 N 1
SFX 24220 0 rırsa .

SFX 24221 N 1
SFX 24221 0 elirse .

SFX 24222 N 1
SFX 24222 0 lerinizdi .

SFX 24223 N 1
SFX 24223 0 şmalarımız .

SFX 24224 N 1
SFX 24224 0 plerimi .

SFX 24225 N 1
SFX 24225 0 leştirilebildiği .

SFX 24226 N 1
SFX 24226 0 feden .

SFX 24227 N 1
SFX 24227 0 laştırılmadığı .

SFX 24228 N 1
SFX 24228 0 zlaktı .

SFX 24229 N 1
SFX 24229 0 üzmüşüz .

SFX 24230 N 1
SFX 24230 0 tmeyiz .

SFX 24231 N 1
SFX 24231 0 nımları .

SFX 24232 N 1
SFX 24232 0 rmada .

SFX 24233 N 1
SFX 24233 0 lamıyorsa .

SFX 24234 N 1
SFX 24234 0 kçimiz .

SFX 24235 N 1
SFX 24235 0 mayabilirsin .

SFX 24236 N 1
SFX 24236 0 lliğimi .

SFX 24237 N 1
SFX 24237 0 amıyordur .

SFX 24238 N 1
SFX 24238 0 anan .

SFX 24239 N 1
SFX 24239 0 nluktur .

SFX 24240 N 1
SFX 24240 0 ştırılmakla .

SFX 24241 N 1
SFX 24241 0 amadıklarımızın .

SFX 24242 N 1
SFX 24242 0 tancılar .

SFX 24243 N 1
SFX 24243 0 atıyordu .

SFX 24244 N 1
SFX 24244 0 amdayım .

SFX 24245 N 1
SFX 24245 0 ndırırım .

SFX 24246 N 1
SFX 24246 0 lümden .

SFX 24247 N 1
SFX 24247 0 züme .

SFX 24248 N 1
SFX 24248 0 üklük .

SFX 24249 N 1
SFX 24249 0 demedim .

SFX 24250 N 1
SFX 24250 0 eşsin .

SFX 24251 N 1
SFX 24251 0 üveriyor .

SFX 24252 N 1
SFX 24252 0 hice .

SFX 24253 N 1
SFX 24253 0 layası .

SFX 24254 N 1
SFX 24254 0 anmalıyız .

SFX 24255 N 1
SFX 24255 0 ikliklerinden .

SFX 24256 N 1
SFX 24256 0 lamadığın .

SFX 24257 N 1
SFX 24257 0 undandı .

SFX 24258 N 1
SFX 24258 0 larımdandı .

SFX 24259 N 1
SFX 24259 0 direbilmek .

SFX 24260 N 1
SFX 24260 0 maldir .

SFX 24261 N 1
SFX 24261 0 dırıldığına .

SFX 24262 N 1
SFX 24262 0 abilmektir .

SFX 24263 N 1
SFX 24263 0 ezinde .

SFX 24264 N 1
SFX 24264 0 resiyle .

SFX 24265 N 1
SFX 24265 0 inle .

SFX 24266 N 1
SFX 24266 0 şsalar .

SFX 24267 N 1
SFX 24267 0 atılması .

SFX 24268 N 1
SFX 24268 0 nabilseydi .

SFX 24269 N 1
SFX 24269 0 kleştirilebilir .

SFX 24270 N 1
SFX 24270 0 ıklılık .

SFX 24271 N 1
SFX 24271 0 şmemişti .

SFX 24272 N 1
SFX 24272 0 yamamıştım .

SFX 24273 N 1
SFX 24273 0 rabilirsen .

SFX 24274 N 1
SFX 24274 0 rumda .

SFX 24275 N 1
SFX 24275 0 ştirebilmesi .

SFX 24276 N 1
SFX 24276 0 ağızlarım .

SFX 24277 N 1
SFX 24277 0 lılarımızın .

SFX 24278 N 1
SFX 24278 0 eştirildiğinin .

SFX 24279 N 1
SFX 24279 0 izizdir .

SFX 24280 N 1
SFX 24280 0 aynım .

SFX 24281 N 1
SFX 24281 0 izinmiş .

SFX 24282 N 1
SFX 24282 0 tınız .

SFX 24283 N 1
SFX 24283 0 leşirdi .

SFX 24284 N 1
SFX 24284 0 elerimiz .

SFX 24285 N 1
SFX 24285 0 şınızı .

SFX 24286 N 1
SFX 24286 0 reni .

SFX 24287 N 1
SFX 24287 0 ılmam .

SFX 24288 N 1
SFX 24288 0 yalık .

SFX 24289 N 1
SFX 24289 0 süzlüğünün .

SFX 24290 N 1
SFX 24290 0 gından .

SFX 24291 N 1
SFX 24291 0 tıydı .

SFX 24292 N 1
SFX 24292 0 hçı .

SFX 24293 N 1
SFX 24293 0 izcesine .

SFX 24294 N 1
SFX 24294 0 diklerimizdi .

SFX 24295 N 1
SFX 24295 0 cuğunuz .

SFX 24296 N 1
SFX 24296 0 ojisine .

SFX 24297 N 1
SFX 24297 0 nunuzda .

SFX 24298 N 1
SFX 24298 0 tırıldık .

SFX 24299 N 1
SFX 24299 0 aştırmayalım .

SFX 24300 N 1
SFX 24300 0 nüsün .

SFX 24301 N 1
SFX 24301 0 arete .

SFX 24302 N 1
SFX 24302 0 tiydik .

SFX 24303 N 1
SFX 24303 0 ilmesini .

SFX 24304 N 1
SFX 24304 0 erliğin .

SFX 24305 N 1
SFX 24305 0 çe .

SFX 24306 N 1
SFX 24306 0 rinedir .

SFX 24307 N 1
SFX 24307 0 zdedir .

SFX 24308 N 1
SFX 24308 0 yeninden .

SFX 24309 N 1
SFX 24309 0 ağız .

SFX 24310 N 1
SFX 24310 0 ndiriciyi .

SFX 24311 N 1
SFX 24311 0 ıklarında .

SFX 24312 N 1
SFX 24312 0 klisi .

SFX 24313 N 1
SFX 24313 0 gillere .

SFX 24314 N 1
SFX 24314 0 ığını .

SFX 24315 N 1
SFX 24315 0 anını .

SFX 24316 N 1
SFX 24316 0 eceklerden .

SFX 24317 N 1
SFX 24317 0 alarken .

SFX 24318 N 1
SFX 24318 0 nlerinkine .

SFX 24319 N 1
SFX 24319 0 üşlüğüm .

SFX 24320 N 1
SFX 24320 0 seninin .

SFX 24321 N 1
SFX 24321 0 nmışsınız .

SFX 24322 N 1
SFX 24322 0 kçiden .

SFX 24323 N 1
SFX 24323 0 tirmezler .

SFX 24324 N 1
SFX 24324 0 ciydi .

SFX 24325 N 1
SFX 24325 0 tirmemeli .

SFX 24326 N 1
SFX 24326 0 rmeyenlerin .

SFX 24327 N 1
SFX 24327 0 aflık .

SFX 24328 N 1
SFX 24328 0 tiremiyoruz .

SFX 24329 N 1
SFX 24329 0 to .

SFX 24330 N 1
SFX 24330 0 binin .

SFX 24331 N 1
SFX 24331 0 anlardayız .
